Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1083.
do enact as follows:SB1083,11Section 1. 101.123 (1) (ah) of the statutes is created to read:SB1083,2,82101.123 (1) (ah) “Electronic delivery device” means a device that may be used 3to deliver any aerosolized or vaporized liquid or other substance for inhalation, 4regardless of whether the liquid or other substance contains nicotine, including an 5e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah. “Electronic delivery device” does 6not include drugs, devices, or combination products authorized for sale by the U.S. 7food and drug administration, as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug, 8and Cosmetic Act.SB1083,29Section 2. 101.123 (1) (h) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB1083,2,1410101.123 (1) (h) “Smoking” means inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying any 11lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, pipe, or any other lighted or heated product 12containing, made, or derived from nicotine, tobacco, cannabis, hemp, or another 13substance, whether natural or synthetic, that is intended for inhalation. “Smoking” 14includes carrying or using an activated electronic delivery device.SB1083,2,1515